West Virginia, session 2026, SB268.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §16-4C-6 of this code, modified by the Department of Health to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 18, 2025, relating to the Department of Health (emergency medical services, 64 CSR 48), is authorized.